Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.360

Rules and regulations—Penalties—Enforcement.

A metropolitan municipal corporation shall have power to adopt by resolution such rules and regulations as shall be necessary or proper to enable it to carry out authorized metropolitan functions and may provide penalties for the violation thereof. Actions to impose or enforce such penalties may be brought in the superior court of the state of Washington in and for the central county.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.58.360. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 36.]